Hawaii statutes.
§431:20-125 Revocation or suspension of
title insurer's certificate of authority. (a) The commissioner may after
a hearing suspend or revoke the certificate of authority of any title insurer
which:

(1) After ten days' written notice from the commissioner
requiring it so to do, fails to print, display, and make available to the
public its schedule of fees and charges in the manner provided in section
431:20-120.

(2) After ten days' written notice from the
commissioner requiring it to cease and desist, continues to pay any commission
or to make any rebate in wilful violation of section 431:20-118.

(b) The hearings shall be conducted in
accordance with section 431:20-103(3) and the commissioner shall have all the
powers granted therein. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next